Washington statutes.
RCW 18.310.080

Licensure—Required use of name and license number.

(1) A license issued under this chapter must bear the signature or facsimile signature of the director and a license number assigned by the director.

(2) Each licensed appraisal management company shall place the name under which it does business and its license number on any appraisal engagement document issued.

[ 2010 c 179 s 6.]